pt-BR: Formato do canudo/agitador: Flexível; Liso; Guarda-chuva; Outro
el: Σχέδιο για καλαμάκι/αναδευτήρα: Εύκαμπτο; Ευθεία; Με ομπρέλα; Άλλο
nb: Design på sugerør/rørepinne: Fleksibel; Rett; Paraply; Annet
tr: Saman/Karıştırıcı tasarımı: Esnek; Düz; Şemsiye; Diğer
da: Sugerør/omrører-design: Fleksibel; Lige; Paraply; Andet
hu: Szívószál/keverő kialakítása: Rugalmas; Egyenes; Esernyő; Egyéb
vi: Thiết kế ống hút/thìa khuấy: Mềm dẻo; Tóc thẳng; Ô; Khác
sv: Utförande med sugrör/omrörare: Flexibel; Rakt; Paraply; Övrigt
sk-SK: Dizajn slamky/miešadla: Flexibilný; Rovný; Dáždnikový; Iné
de: Design des Strohhalms/Rührers: Flexibel; Glatt; Regenschirm; Sonstiges
ru: Конструкция трубочки/коктейльной палочки: Гибкий; Прямой; Зонтик; Другой
en: Straw/Stirrer design: Flexible; Straight; Umbrella; Other
es: Diseño de pajita/agitador: Flexible; Liso; Sombrilla; Otros
pl: Konstrukcja ze słomką/mieszadłem: Elastyczne; Prosta; Parasolka; Inne
bg-BG: Дизайн на сламка/бъркалка: Гъвкав; Прав; Чадър; Други
pt-PT: Design de palhinha/agitador: Flexível; Liso; Sombrinha; Outro
zh-TW: 吸管/攪拌器設計: 柔韌; 直; 傘; 其他
lt-LT: Šiaudelio / maišymo lazdelės dizainas: Lankstūs; Tiesūs; Skėtukas; Kita
it: Design della cannuccia/miscelatore: Flessibile; Dritto; Ombrellini; Altro
fr: Conception de la paille/de l’agitateur: Flexible; Lisses; Parapluie; Autre
ja: ストロー/マドラーの種類: フレキシブル; ストレート; 折りたたみ; その他
nl: Ontwerp rietje/roerder: Flexibel; Steil; Paraplu; Andere
hr-HR: Dizajn slamke/miješalice: Fleksibilna; Ravna; Kišobran; Ostalo
fi: Pillin/sekoittimen muotoilu: Joustava; Suorat; Sateenvarjo; Muu
th: การออกแบบหลอด/ที่คน: ขอบยืดหยุ่น; ผมตรง; ร่ม; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design pai/linguriță de bar: Flexibil; Drept; Umbrelă; Altele
ko: 빨대/커피 스틱 디자인: 유연함; 일자형; 우산; 기타
sl-SI: Zasnova slamice/mešala: Prilagodljivo; Ravno; Dežnik; Drugo
zh-CN: 吸管/搅拌器设计: 灵活式; 直; 伞; 其他
cs: Design slámky/míchadla: Pružná; Rovné; Deštníček; Jiné